Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska16-6,100.04
Joint city-county building; county board and city council; building commission; powers; duties.

The members of the county board of the county and the city council of the city of the first class which agree to build a joint city-county building shall be the building commission to purchase the land for the building and to contract for the erection, equipment, and furnishings of the building and, after completion thereof, shall be in charge of its maintenance and repair.

Laws 1953, c. 32, § 4, p. 121.